Washington statutes.
RCW 10.66.090

Penalties.

(1) A person who willfully disobeys an off-limits order issued under this chapter is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

(2) A person is guilty of a class C felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW if the person willfully disobeys an off-limits order in violation of the terms of the order and also either:

(a) Enters or remains in a PADT area that is within one thousand feet of any school; or

(b) Is convicted of a second or subsequent violation of this chapter.

[ 2003 c 53 s 93; 1989 c 271 s 223.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.